Illinois, session 104th, SB148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Home Buyer Savings Accounts Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) The American Dream has always been closely 9    associated with owning your own home. 10        (2) It is becoming more and more difficult to achieve 11    the goal of homeownership in Illinois and throughout the 12    country.13        (3) Homeownership provides more than a dream to an 14    individual person or family. An increase in homeownership 15    rates in Illinois has a direct positive impact on the 16    quality of our communities, our schools, our economy, and 17    public safety. 18    (b) The purpose of this Act is to: 19        (1) Make it easier for those in Illinois to achieve 20    their goal of homeownership for the first time. 21        (2) Provide a tax incentivized savings account for 22    qualified first-time and certain second-chance home 23    buyers, which, in turn, can be used toward a down payment   SB0148- 2 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1    or certain eligible closing costs for the purchase of a 2    home in Illinois. 3    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    "Account holder" means a first-time and second-chance home 5buyer who establishes, individually or jointly with another 6first-time and second-chance home buyer, a first-time and 7second-chance home buyer savings account.8    "Allowable closing costs" means a disbursement listed on a 9settlement statement for the purchase of a single-family 10residence in Illinois by a first-time and second-chance home 11buyer.12    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.13    "Eligible costs" means the down payment and allowable 14closing costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in 15Illinois by a first-time and second-chance home buyer. 16"Eligible costs" does not include any costs incurred prior to 17the establishment of a first-time and second-chance home buyer 18savings account.19    "Financial institution" means any bank, savings 20institution, industrial loan association, credit union, or 21other similar entity authorized to do business and accept 22deposits in Illinois.23    "First-time and second-chance home buyer" means an 24individual who resides in Illinois and has not owned or 25purchased, either individually or jointly, a single-family   SB0148- 3 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1residence during a period of 10 years prior to the date of the 2purchase of a single-family residence.3    "First-time and second-chance home buyer savings account 4or account" means an account with a financial institution 5created for the purpose of payment or reimbursement of 6eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence 7in Illinois by a first-time and second-chance home buyer and 8designated by the financial institution upon its creation as a 9first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account.10    "Settlement statement" means the statement of receipts and 11disbursements for a transaction related to real estate, 12including a statement prescribed under the federal Real Estate 13Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 and regulations under that 14Act.15    "Single-family residence" means a single-family residence 16owned and occupied by a first-time and second-chance home 17buyer as the first-time and second-chance home buyer's 18principal residence. "Single-family residence" includes, but 19is not limited to, a manufactured home, a trailer, a mobile 20home, a condominium unit, or a cooperative. 21    Section 15. Establishment of a first-time and 22second-chance home buyer savings account. After the effective 23date of this Act, a first-time and second-chance home buyer 24may open an account with a financial institution designated in 25its entirety by the financial institution as a first-time and   SB0148- 4 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1second-chance home buyer savings account. 2    Section 20. Use of a first-time and second-chance home 3buyer savings account. 4    (a) Funds from a first-time and second-chance home buyer 5savings account may be used only to pay a first-time and 6second-chance home buyer's eligible costs for the purchase of 7a single-family residence in Illinois.8    (b) A first-time and second-chance home buyer may jointly 9own a first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account 10with another first-time and second-chance home buyer if the 11joint account holders file a joint income tax return.12    (c) Only cash and marketable securities may be contributed 13to a first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account. 14Subject to the limitations described in Section 35, persons 15other than the account holder may contribute funds to a 16first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account. There 17is no limitation on the amount of contributions that may be 18made to or retained in a first-time and second-chance home 19buyer savings account. 20    Section 25. Account holder responsibilities. 21    (a) The account holder shall do all the following:22        (1) not use funds held in a first-time and 23    second-chance home buyer savings account to pay expenses 24    of administering the account, except that a service or   SB0148- 5 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1    other account fee may be deducted from the account by the 2    financial institution in which the account is held;3        (2) submit the following to the Department with the 4    account holder's Illinois income tax return:5            (A) detailed information, in a form prescribed by 6        the Department, regarding the first-time and 7        second-chance home buyer savings account, including a 8        list of transactions for the account during the tax 9        year; and10            (B) the Form 1099 issued by the financial 11        institution for the account;12        (3) submit to the Department, upon a withdrawal of 13    funds from a first-time and second-chance home buyer 14    savings account, a detailed account of the eligible costs 15    toward which the account funds were applied and a 16    statement of the amount of funds remaining in the account, 17    if any. If upon withdrawal of funds from the first-time 18    and second-chance home buyer savings account, the account 19    holder fails to provide the Department with the detailed 20    account of the eligible costs towards which the account 21    funds were applied, then the entire account's funds, 22    including the interest and other income on principal, 23    shall be subject to the penalties described in Section 40.24    (b) Failure to submit the documentation required under 25subsection (a) on an annual basis with the filing of the 26Illinois income tax return shall result in the automatic   SB0148- 6 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1denial of the deduction and exclusion. 2    Section 30. Responsibilities of financial institutions. 3    (a) A financial institution shall be required to:4        (1) create a new account for the first-time and 5    second-chance home buyer and designate the account as a 6    "first-time and second-chance home buyer's savings 7    account" on records and transactional statements related 8    to the account; and 9        (2) provide the account holder with a detailed account 10    statement relating to the first-time and second-chance 11    home buyer's savings account on a yearly basis.12    (b) A financial institution is not required to:13        (1) track the use of money withdrawn from a first-time 14    and second-chance home buyer savings account;15        (2) allocate funds in a first-time and second-chance 16    home buyer savings account between joint account holders; 17    and18        (3) report any information not otherwise required by 19    law to the Department or any other governmental agency.20    (c) A financial institution is not responsible or liable 21for:22        (1) determining or ensuring that an account satisfies 23    the requirements to be a first-time and second-chance home 24    buyer savings account;25        (2) determining or ensuring that funds in a first-time   SB0148- 7 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1    and second-chance home buyer savings account are used for 2    eligible costs; or3        (3) reporting or remitting taxes or penalties related 4    to the use of a first-time and second-chance home buyer 5    savings account.6    (d) Upon being furnished proof of the death of the account 7holder and any other information related to the death required 8by the financial institution or contract governing the 9first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account, a 10financial institution shall distribute the principal and 11accumulated interest or other income in the account in 12accordance with the terms of the contract governing the 13account or as otherwise required by law. 14    Section 35. Deduction of contributions, exclusion of 15earnings, and limitations. 16    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act and subject 17to the limitations under this section, a first-time and 18second-chance home buyer savings account holder shall be 19entitled to a state tax deduction, subject to the limitations 20of this Section, not to exceed $5,000 for an account holder who 21files an individual tax return or $10,000 for joint account 22holders who file a joint tax return, for contributions made by 23the account holder to a first-time and second-chance home 24buyer savings account during the tax year in which the 25deduction is claimed.  SB0148- 8 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Act and subject 2to the limitations under this Section, earnings from the 3first-time and second-chance home buyer savings account, 4including interest and other income on the principal, shall be 5excluded from taxable income of an account holder for Illinois 6income tax purposes during the tax year.7    (c) An account holder may claim the deduction and 8exclusion under this Section as follows:9        (1) for a period not to exceed 10 years;10        (2) for an aggregate total amount of principal and 11    earnings not to exceed $25,000 for individual accounts and 12    $50,000 for joint accounts during the 10-year period;13        (3) only if the principal and earnings of the account 14    remain in the account until a withdrawal is made for 15    eligible costs related to the purchase of a single-family 16    residence by a first-time and second-chance home buyer.17    (d) A person other than the account holder who deposits 18funds in a first-time and second-chance home buyer savings 19account shall not be entitled to the deduction and exclusion 20provided under this Act.21    (e) The deduction and exclusion from taxable income 22provided by this Act shall apply to any alternative basis for 23calculating taxable income for Illinois income tax purposes.24    (f) The funds in the first-time and second-chance home 25buyer savings account shall not be used to purchase a 26single-family residence outside of this State.   SB0148- 9 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1    Section 40. Penalty for withdrawal for purpose other than 2eligible costs. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 3if the account holder withdraws any funds from a first-time 4and second-chance home buyer savings account for a purpose 5other than eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family 6residence in this State, all of the following shall apply:7        (1) The entire balance of the fund, including interest 8    and other income on principal, shall be included in the 9    account holder's taxable income for the tax year in which 10    the withdrawal was made.11        (2) The account holder shall pay a penalty to the 12    Department equal to 10% of the amount withdrawn. The 13    penalty shall not apply to funds withdrawn from an account 14    which were:15            (A) withdrawn by reason of the account holder's 16        death or disability or due to unemployment after the 17        account holder has exhausted his or her applicable 18        unemployment compensation benefits; or19            (B) a disbursement of assets of the account 20        pursuant to a filing for protection under the United 21        States Bankruptcy Code.22    Paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply to funds withdrawn or 23distributed from a first-time and second-chance home buyer 24savings account that within 60 days of their withdrawal or 25distribution are deposited in full into another first-time and   SB0148- 10 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1second-chance home buyer savings account. This subdivision 2shall apply both to transfers between any qualifying 3first-time and second-chance home buyer savings accounts 4whether such transfers are to or from qualifying individual or 5joint accounts. 6    Section 45. Department of revenue; forms. The Department 7shall adopt forms for the following:8        (1) The designation of an account with a financial 9    institution to serve as a first-time and second-chance 10    home buyer savings account.11        (2) An account holder to annually submit to the 12    Department detailed information regarding the first-time 13    and second-chance home buyer savings account, including, 14    but not limited to, a list of transactions for the account 15    during the tax year and identifying any supporting 16    documentation required to be maintained by the account 17    holder. 18    Section 50. Annual report. The Department shall submit an 19annual report to the General Assembly no later than March 31 of 20each calendar year with the first annual report due no later 21than March 31, 2026, in which the Department shall include the 22total annual number of deductions claimed and total amount of 23deposits deducted pursuant to this Act, the number of 24taxpayers who submitted an account to the Department pursuant   SB0148- 11 -LRB104 07697 BAB 17741 b1to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 25, and the 2number of taxpayers who were subjected to the penalty 3provisions of Section 40.